test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-allnouns_gt-norm.yaml
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg: okimâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl: okimâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Loc: [okimâwihk, okimâwinâhk]
     okimâw+N+AN+Obv: okimâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: okimâsis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: okimâsisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [okimâsisihk, okimâsisinâhk]
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminân
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicôkimâmis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicôkimâmis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicôkimâmisinân
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicôkimâmisinaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicôkimâmisiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicôkimâmisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicôkimâmisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicôkimâmisinânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicôkimâmisinawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicôkimâmisiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otôkimâmiyihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôkimâminâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôkimâminâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôkimâmiwâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôkimâmiwâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôkimâmiyihk
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicôkimâmisihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicôkimâmisihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocôkimâmisihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocôkimâmisiyihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicôkimâmisinâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicôkimâmisinâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicôkimâmisiwâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocôkimâmisiwâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocôkimâmisiyihk

  
  Noun - okâwîmâw - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, mother, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwiy
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwiy
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwinân
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwinaw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwiyak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwiyak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwinânak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwinawak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâwak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwisis
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwisis
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinân
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinaw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâw
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwisisak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwisisak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinânak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinawak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâwak
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okâwihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: okâwiyihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikâwinâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikâwinâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikâwiwâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okâwiwâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: okâwiyihk

     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okâwisisihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: okâwisisiyihk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikâwisisinâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikâwisisinâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikâwisisiwâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okâwisisiwâhk
     okâwîmâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: okâwisisiyihk

  
  Noun - ôsi - ok : # -m animate noun
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg: ôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl: ôsa
     ôsi+N+IN+Loc: ôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: ôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: ôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: ôcisisihk

     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: otôtiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôtinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôtinaw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôtiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôtiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otôtiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: otôtiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôtinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôtinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôtiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôtiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otôtiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ocôcisisiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicôcisisinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicôcisisinaw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicôcisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocôcisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ocôcisisiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: ocôcisisiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicôcisisinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicôcisisinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicôcisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocôcisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ocôcisisiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: otôtiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôtinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôtinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôtiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôtiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôtiyihk

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocôcisisiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicôcisisinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicôcisisinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicôcisisiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocôcisisiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocôcisisiyihk


  
  Noun - otânisimâw - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, daughter, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitânisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitânisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa 
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitânisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitânisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otânisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitânisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitânisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitânisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otânisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otânisiyihk

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicânisisisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicânisisisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicânisisisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
